Utah statutes.
34-27-1.   Reasonable amount -- Taxed as costs.

Whenever a mechanic, artisan, miner, laborer, servant, or other employee shall have cause to bring suit for wages earned and due according to the terms of his employment and shall establish by the decision of the court that the amount for which he has brought suit is justly due, and that a demand has been made in writing at least 15 days before suit was brought for a sum not to exceed the amount so found due, then it shall be the duty of the court before which the case shall be tried to allow to the plaintiff a reasonable attorneys' fee in addition to the amount found due for wages, to be taxed as costs of suit.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

